Wyoming, session 2025, HB0267.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-51-201 through 11-51-213 are
created to read:
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

ARTICLE 2
CONSUMABLE HEMP PRODUCTS

11-51-201. Purpose; limitations.

The purpose of this article is to regulate the manufacture,
distribution and sale of consumable hemp products.

11-51-202. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(i) "Batch" means any one (1) or more of the
following:

(A) A specific quantity of hemp plants that
are cultivated from the same seed or plant stock, are
cultivated together, are intended to be harvested together
and that receive an identical propagation and cultivation
treatment;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(B) A specific quantity of hemp flower that
is harvested together, is uniform and is intended to meet
specifications for identity, strength, purity and
composition and that receives identical sorting, drying,
curing and storage treatment;

(C) A specific quantity of hemp-derived
consumable product that is:

(I) Manufactured at the same time and
using the same methods, equipment and ingredients;

(II) Uniform and intended to meet
specifications for identity, strength, purity and
composition;

(III) Manufactured, packaged and
labeled according to a single batch production record that
is executed and documented.

(ii) "Batch number" means a unique numeric or
alphanumeric identifier assigned to a batch of hemp plants
or hemp-derived consumable products;
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(iii) "Business" means any of the following
licensed under this article a consumable hemp product:

(A) Distributor;

(B) Retailer;

(C) Manufacturer.

(iv) "Counter" means the point of purchase in a
retail establishment that provides separation designed to
make an area of the retail establishment inaccessible to
the customer;

(v) "Distributor" means a person that purchases
consumable hemp products from manufacturers and sells them
to retailers;

(vi) "Division" means the Wyoming liquor
division within the department of revenue created under
W.S. 12-2-106;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(vii) "Franchise" means a written or oral
arrangement for a definite or indefinite period, in which a
person grants to another person a license to use a trade
name, trademark, service mark or related characteristic and
in which there is a commonality of interest in the
marketing of goods or services at wholesale, retail, by
lease, agreement or otherwise, including but not limited to
a commercial relationship of definite or indefinite
duration between a manufacturer and distributor where the
distributor is granted the right to offer, sell and
distribute within this state or any designated area of the
state some or all of the manufacturer's consumable hemp
products to retailers;

(viii) "Independent testing laboratory" means a
laboratory that meets all of the following conditions:

(A) The laboratory holds an ISO 17025
accreditation, is registered with the United States drug
enforcement administration in accordance with 21 C.F.R. §
1301.13 or holds an equivalent accreditation;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(B) The laboratory does not have a direct
or indirect interest in the person or entity whose product
is being tested or in a facility that cultivates,
processes, distributes, dispenses or sells consumable hemp
products in this state or any other jurisdiction;

(C) The laboratory performs
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration sampling and testing
using the high-performance chromatography method or another
method of testing authorized by the division.

(ix) "License" means a license issued in
accordance with this article;

(x) "Manufacture" means to compound, blend,
extract, infuse, cook or otherwise make or prepare
consumable hemp products, including the processes of
extraction, infusion, packaging, repackaging, labeling and
relabeling of consumable hemp products;

(xi) "Manufacturer" means any person who
manufactures consumable hemp products;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(xii) "Producer" means any person who engages in
the process of farming and harvesting hemp that is intended
to be used in the manufacture of a hemp-derived consumable
product;

(xiii) "Proof of age" means a valid driver's
license or other government-issued identification card that
contains a photograph of the person and confirms the
person's age as twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

(xiv) "Retail establishment" means a place of
business open to the general public for the sale of goods
or services and includes a food service establishment;

(xv) "Retailer" means any person who sells
consumable hemp products for consumption and not for
resale;

(xvi) "Serving" means a quantity of a consumable
hemp product indicated on the packaging of the consumable
hemp product;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(xvii) "Tincture" means hemp-infused liquid or
oils administered orally in small amounts using a dropper
that indicates the serving size.

11-51-203. Prohibited activities; penalties.

(a) No person shall act as a distributor,
manufacturer or retailer of consumable hemp products unless
the person has a license as a business issued under this
article and the consumable hemp product manufactured,
distributed or sold at retail by the person is registered
with the division as provided in this article.

(b) No person shall do any of the following:

(i) Knowingly sell or distribute a consumable
hemp product to a person who is under twenty-one (21) years
of age;

(ii) Except as provided in subsection (g) of
this section, knowingly purchase a consumable hemp product
on behalf of a person who is under twenty-one (21) years of
age;
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(iii) Except as provided in subsection (h) of
this section, knowingly persuade, entice, send or assist a
person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age to
purchase, acquire, receive or attempt to purchase a
consumable hemp product;

(iv) Knowingly distribute samples of consumable
hemp products outside of a retail establishment unless
specifically authorized under this article;

(v) Knowingly sell or distribute a consumable
hemp product without having first obtained proof of age
from the purchaser or recipient, unless an ordinary person
would conclude on the basis of appearance that the
purchaser or recipient is not under the age of twenty-one
(21) years.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this
section, no person who is under twenty-one (21) years of
age shall knowingly purchase, possess or accept receipt of
a consumable hemp product or knowingly present purported
proof of age that is false, fraudulent or not actually that
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
person for the purpose of purchasing or receiving a
consumable hemp product.

(d) All consumable hemp products, except beverage
products that do not exceed a total of ten (10) milligrams
per serving of delta-8 THC, delta-9 THC, delta-10 THC or
any combination of those, shall be maintained behind the
counter of a retail establishment or in another area that
is inaccessible to a customer. Any consumable hemp product
beverage, including those in cases or boxes, offered for
retail sale shall be merchandised in a manner to clearly
indicate to consumers that the product contains
hemp-derived cannabinoids. Failure to maintain consumable
hemp products in accordance with this subsection is a
violation of this section.

(e) No person shall deliver, ship or cause to be
delivered or shipped any consumable hemp product beverage
directly to any person who is not licensed under this
article. It shall not be a violation of this subsection for
any delivery of a consumable hemp product beverage to a
customer at a retail establishment or at a location
otherwise authorized under this article.
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(f) A first violation of any provision of this
section shall result in a fine of not more than two hundred
fifty dollars ($250.00). A second or subsequent violation
of any provision of this section shall be a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, or both.

(g) It shall not be a violation of this section for a
person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to possess or
consume consumable hemp products under the supervision of
the person's parent or guardian if the parent or guardian
has a written document from a physician recommending the
use of consumable hemp products for the person under the
age of twenty-one (21) years.

(h) This section does not preclude law enforcement
efforts to purchase consumable hemp products from retail
establishments involving:

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(i) The use of a minor seventeen (17) years of
age or younger if the minor's parent or legal guardian has
provided consent; or

(ii) The use of a person aged eighteen (18),
nineteen (19) or twenty (20) years if the individual
provides consent.

(j) Any consumable hemp product sold or offered for
sale or consumption in violation of this section is subject
to seizure and forfeiture.

(k) Nothing in this article shall:

(i) Permit any person to undertake any task
under the influence of a consumable hemp product when doing
so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice
or would otherwise create a danger to the person or others;

(ii) Operate, navigate or be in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft,
or any other vehicle while under the influence of a
hemp-derived cannabinoid;
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(iii) Require an employer to allow the use of a
consumable hemp products in a workplace or allow an
employee to work while under the influence of a consumable
hemp product;

(iv) Exempt a person from prosecution for a
criminal offense related to impairment or intoxication
resulting from use of a consumable hemp product or relieve
a person from any requirement under law to submit to a
breath, blood, urine or other test to detect the presence
of a controlled substance.

11-51-204. Administration.

(a) The division shall enforce this article in a
manner that may reasonably be expected to reduce the extent
to which consumable hemp products are sold or distributed
to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age. The
department of revenue shall adopt rules necessary to
implement this article.

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(b) The division shall conduct random inspections of
consumable hemp products distributed or available for
distribution in the state for compliance with this article.
Inspections under this subsection shall include the
periodic sampling, analyzing and testing of consumable hemp
products distributed within the state for compliance with
the registration, labeling and testing requirements of this
article. The division may conduct an inspection under this
subsection for any reason the division determines is
necessary.

(c) Not later than November 1 of each year the
division shall submit a report to the joint judiciary
interim committee describing in detail the division's
enforcement efforts under this article. The report shall
also be made available to the public on the department of
revenue's website.

11-51-205. Licensing.

(a) Each business shall obtain a license from the
division prior to any manufacturing, distribution or retail
sale of any consumable hemp product.
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(b) The application for a license under this section
shall include at minimum:

(i) The name and address of the applicant;

(ii) The physical address and legal description
of all property where the business will operate as a
distributor, manufacturer or retailer;

(iii) A statement that the applicant has not
been convicted of or pled no contest to a controlled
substance felony within the past ten (10) years, or in the
event the applicant is not an individual person, a
statement that no member, principal, officer or director of
the applicant has been convicted of or pled no contest to a
controlled substance felony;

(iv) Authorization for reasonable access by the
department for inspections and verifications related to
this article;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(v) Verification that the applicant is a
business entity organized under the laws of Wyoming or is a
Wyoming resident, as defined by rule of the department of
revenue;

(vi) Any other information required by rule of
the department of revenue.

(c) Subject to the limitations of subsection (e) of
this section, the division shall issue a license, or
renewal thereof, which is valid for one (1) year if:

(i) The requirements of subsection (b) of this
section are met, including that the applicant has not been
convicted of or pled no contest to a controlled substance
felony within the past ten (10) years; and

(ii) A fee of two hundred fifty dollars
($250.00) for distributors or manufacturers and a fee of
one hundred dollars ($100.00) for retailers per location is
paid for each annual license or renewal application. If a
retailer has multiple locations, the fee under this
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
paragraph shall not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500.00).

(d) All fees collected under this section shall be
deposited with the state treasurer in a separate account,
which is hereby created and is continuously appropriated to
the department of revenue for the administration of this
article by the division.

(e) Except in the case of a manufacturer who sells
less than one thousand (1,000) gallons of consumable hemp
product beverages per year:

(i) No person who is engaged in the production,
manufacturing, distribution or sale of consumable hemp
product beverages shall hold more than one (1) type of
license under this section or have any financial interest,
either direct or indirect, in a person holding any of the
other types of licenses under this section;

(ii) No consumable hemp product beverage
manufacturer shall directly solicit, sell or otherwise
convey consumable hemp product beverages to retailers.
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
Manufacturers of consumable hemp product beverages are
authorized to solicit and sell consumable hemp product
beverages to distributors. Distributors are authorized to
solicit and sell consumable hemp product beverages to
retailers.

(f) The division may suspend, revoke or not renew any
license issued under this article if, after notice and
opportunity for a hearing, the division finds the provider
has violated this article or any rule promulgated under
this article.

11-51-206. Testing requirements.

(a) Each manufacturer shall have all consumable hemp
products or each batch of consumable hemp products tested
prior to distribution to a distributor for distribution in
Wyoming or before distributing the product to a retailer.
If a consumable hemp product is packaged in a manner that
may be sold to the ultimate consumer after being delivered
to the distributor and the distributor does not open the
package, the distributor is not required to further test
the consumable hemp product under this section. If the
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
consumable hemp product or batch of consumable hemp
products is not packaged in a manner that may be sold to
the ultimate consumer after being delivered to the
distributor or if the distributor opens the package, the
distributor shall have the consumable hemp product tested
prior to distribution as provided in this section. The
testing under this section shall determine the presence and
amounts of any of the substances listed in subsection (b)
of this section. No product that contains more than the
maximum amount indicated for any substance in subsection
(b) of this section shall be distributed or sold in this
state.

(b) The division, through the department of revenue,
shall promulgate rules specifying the pass and fail levels
for safety and toxicity with respect to the testing
required by this subsection. All consumable hemp products
offered for sale or distribution in this state shall be
tested for the presence of and amount of the following
substances:

(i) Heavy metals;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(ii) Pesticides;

(iii) Mycotoxins;

(iv) Solvents;

(v) Microbials;

(vi) THC.

(c) The manufacturer and distributor shall contract
with an independent testing laboratory to provide any
testing required under this section.

(d) An independent testing laboratory providing
testing required under this section shall use high
performance liquid chromatography or a comparable and
validated testing method for any separation and measurement
required in the testing.

(e) Each consumable hemp product or batch of
consumable hemp products tested in accordance with this
section shall be accompanied by a validly issued
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
certificate of analysis from an independent testing
laboratory. The certificate of analysis shall include all
of the following:

(i) The batch identification number;

(ii) The date the consumable hemp product or
batch was received for testing;

(iii) The date testing was completed;

(iv) The method of analysis for each test
conducted;

(v) Proof that the certificate of analysis is
issued for the product specified on the certificate.

(f) Each consumable hemp product or batch shall have
an expiration date on the label that conforms with
applicable federal law and shall be not more than two (2)
years from the date of publication of the product's
certificate of analysis required by this section.

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(g) The division shall:

(i) Maintain and post on its website or the
website of the department of revenue a registry of testing
laboratories that are qualified to test consumable hemp
products;

(ii) Develop an application and process by which
qualifying laboratories are listed on the website as
provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection. The
application submitted by a potentially qualifying
laboratory shall include a sample certificate of analysis
issued by the applying laboratory.

11-51-207. Label requirements.

(a) The label of each consumable hemp product offered
for distribution or sale in this state shall contain the
following information, legibly displayed:

(i) The product name or common name for the
product, on the front of the label;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(ii) The brand name of the product, on the front
of the label;

(iii) The net count of individual items in the
container, if applicable, on the front of the label;

(iv) The net weight or volume of the product;

(v) Suggested product use, including serving
sizes if the product is intended for ingestion or
inhalation;

(vi) A list of ingredients in the product,
including:

(A) The amount of any cannabinoid or
combination of cannabinoids, in milligrams;

(B) A list of allergens;

(C) The manufacturer or distributor name
and address;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(D) Batch number;

(E) A statement that use while pregnant or
breastfeeding may be harmful;

(F) A statement that the product contains
hemp-derived cannabinoids and that consumption of certain
cannabinoids may impair your ability to drive or operate
heavy machinery or motor vehicles;

(G) A statement to keep out of the reach of
children;

(H) A statement that it is unlawful for a
person less than twenty-one (21) years of age to use or
consume the product;

(J) A statement to consult your physician
before use;

(K) A statement that consuming consumable
hemp products may result in a failed drug test;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(M) The following text: "This product has
not been evaluated by the Food and Drug Administration.
This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure,
mitigate or prevent any disease.";

(N) The following text: "Warning – The
safety of this product has not been determined."; and

(O) An expiration date in accordance with
W.S. 11-51-206(f).

(b) No consumable hemp product labels shall:

(i) Have any likeness or bear any reasonable
resemblance to a human, animal, cartoon character or
fictional character known to appeal primarily to persons
under twenty-one (21) years of age;

(ii) Appear to imitate a food, candy or other
commonly available snack product that is typically marketed
toward or appealing to children.

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(c) The limitations of subsection (b) of this section
shall not prevent the use of drawings, illustrations or
artwork depicting nonmythical creatures, inanimate objects,
scenery, humanoid characters, fruit or flavor focused
images or any other items not known to appeal primarily to
persons under twenty-one (21) years of age.

11-51-208. Product requirements and restrictions.

(a) Each consumable hemp product that is sold in this
state shall meet the following requirements:

(i) Be labeled in accordance with W.S. 11-51-207
and include a quick response code that directs consumers to
all testing requirements specified by W.S. 11-51-206;

(ii) Satisfy the child resistant effectiveness
standards under 16 C.F.R. § 1700.15(b)(1) when tested in
accordance with the requirements set forth in 16 C.F.R. §
1700.20. This paragraph shall not apply to consumable hemp
product beverages;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(iii) Be manufactured in the United States under
the applicable law governing the manufacture of consumable
hemp products in the jurisdiction where the product was
manufactured.

(b) No consumable hemp product intended for
ingestion, including beverage products, shall:

(i) Be sold in a serving that contains more than
one hundred (100) milligrams, in the aggregate, of any
combination of delta-8 THC, delta-9 THC and delta-10 THC;

(ii) Be formed in the shape of an animal or
cartoon character.

(c) No consumable hemp product intended for
inhalation shall:

(i) Be sold in a container that contains more
than six (6) milliliters or six (6) milligrams of
hemp-derived cannabinoids, in the aggregate, of any
combination of delta-8 THC, delta-9 THC and delta-10 THC;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(ii) Have a certificate of analysis issued by an
independent testing laboratory that was issued more than
twelve (12) months before the date of the sale.

11-51-209. Product registration.

(a) Each consumable hemp product distributed or
available for sale in Wyoming shall be officially
registered annually with the division and shall comply with
the following requirements:

(i) Application for registration shall be made
to the division on a form required by the division and
shall include the following information:

(A) The name and address of the applicant
and the name and address of the person whose name will
appear on the label, if different than the applicant;

(B) The name of the product;

(C) The type and use of the product;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(D) A complete copy of the label as it will
appear on the product in a legible format;

(E) If the product has been assigned a
national drug code in accordance with 21 C.F.R. § 207.33,
the applicant shall provide the national drug code number;
and

(F) A certificate of analysis from an
independent testing laboratory for the consumable hemp
product in compliance with W.S. 11-51-206.

(b) The division may deny registration of a
consumable hemp product for an incomplete application.

(c) A new registration shall be required under this
section for any of the following:

(i) Any change in the ingredients of the
consumable hemp product, including any change in the amount
or ratio of the ingredients;

(ii) A change to the directions for use;
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(iii) A change of name for the product.

(d) If there are any changes to a consumable hemp
product that do not require a new registration under
subsection (c) of this section, the registrant shall submit
copies of each label change to the division as soon as the
changes are effective.

(e) A hemp-derived consumable product that has been
discontinued shall continue to be registered in the state
until the product is no longer available for distribution
or sale.

(f) The registrant is responsible for the accuracy
and completeness of all information submitted under this
section.

11-51-210. Retail establishments.

(a) Each retail establishment that offers consumable
hemp products shall be licensed as a retailer by the
division in accordance with this article.
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(b) No retailer shall sell or offer for sale any
consumable hemp product unless the product is registered
with the division as provided in W.S. 11-51-209.

(c) A retailer may offer consumable hemp products at
a temporary event or festival after registering the event
with the division and paying an event registration fee of
one hundred dollars ($100.00).

(d) No retailer shall be located within one hundred
(100) feet of a school if children under the age of
eighteen (18) years attend the school.

(e) No business that distributes, sells or serves
consumable hemp products shall employ any person who is
under twenty-one (21) years of age, unless the person
employed is at least eighteen (18) years of age and is
under the direct supervision of a person twenty-one (21)
years of age or older.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
only pre-packaged registered consumable hemp products shall
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
be offered as ready-to-consume or for direct consumption at
a retailer. Consumable hemp products shall not be added to
an ingestible food product by a retailer, provided that
consumable hemp product beverages may be added to a
nonalcoholic ingestible beverage product at a retailer that
is a food service establishment. A retailer that is a food
service establishment shall, upon request, provide the
consumer with copy of the consumable hemp product's
registration with the division in conjunction with
incorporating a consumable hemp product beverage with a
nonalcoholic beverage under this subsection.

(g) Any retailer offering on-site consumption of
consumable hemp products shall provide to consumers upon
request:

(i) The common name of the product;

(ii) The distributor or manufacturer of the
product;

(iii) A copy of the division's registration of
the consumable hemp product.
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(h) A retailer offering on-site consumption of
consumable hemp products shall notify the division not
later than twenty-four (24) hours after the establishment
knows of any serious adverse event related to a consumable
hemp product sold by the establishment.

(j) No manufacturer or distributor shall pay a
retailer, nor shall any retailer accept, any payment,
credit or any other consideration to induce the retailer to
advertise or display a consumable hemp product in a certain
manner or to offer the consumable hemp product on the
retailer's licensed premises.

11-51-211. Excise tax.

(a) An excise tax at the rate of two percent (2%) is
imposed on the retail sale of a consumable hemp product.
The tax under this subsection is in addition to any tax
imposed under any other provision of federal, state or
local law. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, the tax under this subsection shall be collected
and paid to the department of revenue in the same manner as
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
the sales tax on the consumable hemp product in accordance
with W.S. 39-15-101 through 39-15-111.

(b) All taxes collected under subsection (a) of this
section shall be reported, paid and accounted for
separately. All taxes collected under subsection (a) of
this section shall be deposited in the general fund.

11-51-212. Franchises for distributors of consumable
hemp product beverages.

(a) If more than one (1) franchise for the same brand
or brands of consumable hemp product beverages is granted
to different distributors in Wyoming, it is a violation of
this section for any manufacturer to discriminate between
the distributors with respect to any of the terms,
provisions or conditions of the franchises.

(b) Notwithstanding the terms, provisions and
conditions of any franchise, no manufacturer shall
unilaterally terminate, refuse to continue or substantially
change the condition of any franchise with a distributor
unless the manufacturer has first established good cause
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
for the termination, failure to continue or substantial
change.

(c) Any distributor may bring an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction against a manufacturer for violation
of any of the provisions of this section and may recover
damages sustained by the distributor together with the
costs of the action and reasonable attorney fees.

(d) In any action brought under subsection (c) of
this section for a termination, failure to continue or
change in violation of this section, it is a complete
defense for the manufacturer to prove that the termination,
failure to continue or change was done in good faith and
for good cause.

(e) As used in this section:

(i) "Good cause" means any of the following:

(A) Failure by the distributor to comply
substantially with the provisions of an agreement or
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
understanding with the manufacturer, if the provisions are
both essential and reasonable;

(B) Bad faith by the distributor or failure
of the distributor to observe reasonable commercial
standards of fair dealing in the trade;

(C) Revocation, or suspension for more than
thirty (30) days, of the distributor's license.

(ii) "Good faith" is the duty of each party to
any franchise and all officers, employees or agents thereof
to act in a fair manner towards each other.

11-51-213. Safe harbor.

(a) The testing requirements under W.S. 11-51-206,
the label requirements under W.S. 11-51-207 and the product
registration requirements under W.S. 11-15-208 shall not
apply to any consumable hemp product manufactured or held
in Wyoming if the product will not be sold by a retailer in
Wyoming or will not be sold to a consumer in Wyoming.

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to
prevent the division from conducting inspections as
provided in W.S. 11-51-204(b) to ensure compliance with
this article.

Section 2. W.S. 11-51-101(a)(iii), (iv), (vi) and by
creating new paragraphs (ix) through (xiii), 11-51-102(b),
11-51-103(a), 11-51-104(a)(intro), (iii) and (b) through
(d), 11-51-505(a), 11-51-106, 11-51-107, 14-3-310(a), (e)
and (f) and 35-7-1063(a) by creating a new paragraph (iv),
(b)(i), (ii), by creating a new paragraph (iii) and by
renumbering (iii) as (iv) are amended to read:

ARTICLE 1
HEMP PRODUCTION

11-51-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(iii) "Hemp" or "hemp product" means all parts,
seeds and varieties of the plant cannabis sativa l.,
whether growing or not, or a product, derivative, extract,
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
cannabinoid, isomer, acid, salt or salt of isomer made from
that plant with no synthetic substance and with a delta-9
THC concentration of not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis; when using
post-decarboxylation or another similarly reliable testing
method;

(iv) "Licensee" means a person licensed under
this chapter article to produce, process or test hemp;

(vi) "Process" means converting hemp into
another a hemp product, excluding a consumable hemp
product, that contains no synthetic substance and that
contains no more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
THC on a dry weight basis when using post-decarboxylation
or another similarly reliable testing method;

(ix) "Consumable hemp product" means a product
produced from hemp or containing a hemp-derived cannabinoid
that is a finished good intended for human ingestion or
inhalation and that contains not more than three-tenths of
one percent (0.3%) concentration of delta-9 THC on a dry
weight basis but that may contain concentrations of other
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
hemp-derived cannabinoids in excess of that amount.
"Consumable hemp product" does not include products
intended for topical application, hemp seeds or products
derived from hemp seeds including hemp seed oil that are
generally recognized as safe by the United States food and
drug administration;

(x) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid" means any
cannabinoid derived from a compound found in hemp,
including, but not limited to, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
(delta-9 THC), tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA),
cannabidiol (CBD), cannabidiolic acid (CBDA), cannabinol
(CBN), cannabigerol (CBG), cannabicrhomene (CBC)
cannabicycol (CBL), cannabivarin (CBV),
tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCV), cannabidivarin (CBDV),
cannabicitran (CBT), delta-7 tetraydrocannabinol (delta-7
THC), delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8 THC), delta-10
tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-10 THC) or hexahydrocannabinol
(HHC). This term also includes any synthetic cannabinoid
derived from hemp and contained in a consumable hemp
product;

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(xi) "Hemp product" includes animal feed
products derived from hemp, fiber products, grain, products
intended for topical application and hemp seeds or products
derived from hemp seeds that are generally recognized as
safe by the United States food and drug administration.
"Hemp product" shall not include a consumable hemp product;

(xii) "Ingestion" means the process of consuming
hemp through the mouth by swallowing into the
gastrointestinal system;

(xiii) "Inhalation" means the process of
consuming hemp through the respiratory system through the
mouth or nasal passageway.

11-51-102. Hemp as agricultural crop; use of hemp.

(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter,
the possession, purchase, sale, transportation and use of
hemp and hemp products by any person is allowable. except
The manufacture, distribution and sale of consumable hemp
products is allowed and regulated as provided in W.S.
11-51-103(f) and 14-3-310 11-51-201 through 11-51-213.
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

11-51-103. Licensing; prohibited activities.

(a) No person shall produce hemp or process hemp or
hemp products unless the person has obtained a license from
the department on a form provided by the department. No
person shall manufacture, distribute or sell consumable
hemp products except as provided in W.S. 11-51-201 through
11-51-213.

11-51-104. Enforcement; fees; penalties.

(a) The department shall perform inspections and
provide chemical sampling and analysis of production or
processing activities by licensees to determine compliance
with this chapter article. The department may require
verification of effective disposal by licensees of hemp or
hemp products that contain synthetic substances or that
contain in excess of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) THC
on a dry weight basis. For any sample, analysis or
verification conducted under this subsection, the
department shall assess the licensee fees as established by
rule of the department, not to exceed the following:
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465

(iii) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for
verification of effective disposal of hemp or hemp products
that contain synthetic substances or that contain in excess
of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) THC on a dry weight
basis.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this
section, any licensee who violates any provision of this
chapter article or any regulation promulgated pursuant to
this chapter article shall be subject to a corrective
action plan. The corrective action plan may include
reporting requirements, additional inspections, suspension
of a license, steps necessary to restore a license,
requirements related to disposal of hemp or hemp products
that contain in excess of three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%) THC on a dry weight basis or providing notice of the
violation to the licensee's known creditors. The plan may
require rendering THC inaccessible by using hemp or hemp
products as a soil amendment material or by destruction of
the hemp or hemp product as authorized by rule of the
department.

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(c) Any person who intentionally violates this
chapter article is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months,
or both.

(d) If any person has three (3) or more violations of
this chapter article or any regulation promulgated pursuant
to this chapter article within five (5) years, the
department shall revoke the license and the person shall be
ineligible for licensure under this chapter article for
five (5) years.

11-51-105. Rules; agreements; research activities.

(a) The department shall adopt rules necessary to
implement the provisions of this chapter article.

11-51-106. Disposition of fees.

All fees collected under this chapter article shall be
deposited with the state treasurer in a separate account
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
which is continuously appropriated to the department for
the administration of this chapter article.

11-51-107. Exception if this article is not
implemented.

Nothing in this chapter article shall preclude any person
from applying for and receiving authorization to produce
and process hemp from another authorized entity if the
department does not receive authority to do so or is
otherwise not implementing this chapter article.

14-3-310. Prohibited sales or delivery of edible
products and vaping products.

(a) No person or retailer shall sell, permit the
sale, offer for sale, give away or deliver consumable hemp
products as defined by W.S. 11-51-101(a)(ix), edible
products or vaping products to any person under the age of
eighteen (18) twenty-one (21) years.

(e) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution
under subsection (a) this section that, in the case of a
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
sale, the person who sold the consumable hemp products as
defined by W.S. 11-51-101(a)(ix), edible product or vaping
product was presented with, and reasonably relied upon, an
identification card which identified the person buying or
receiving the edible product or vaping product as being
over eighteen (18) twenty-one (21) years of age.

(f) The prohibitions in this section shall not be
construed to apply to the sale or dispensing of cannabidiol
oil that has not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) of
tetrahydrocannabinol to a parent or guardian for use by the
parent's or guardian's child who is less than eighteen (18)
twenty-one (21) years of age.

35-7-1063. Exceptions to provisions.

(a) The provisions and penalties of this chapter
shall not apply to:

(iv) The manufacture, distribution, sale,
possession or use of consumable hemp products in accordance
with the provisions of W.S. 11-51-201 through 11-51-213.

HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
(b) As used in this section:

(i) "Hemp" or "Consumable hemp product" means
all parts, seeds and varieties of the plant cannabis sativa
l. or a product made from that plant with no synthetic
substances and with a THC concentration of not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis as
defined by W.S. 11-51-101(a)(ix);

(ii) "Synthetic substance" "Hemp" means as
defined by W.S. 11-51-101(a)(viii) 11-51-101(a)(iii);

(iii) "Hemp product" means as defined by W.S.
11-51-101(a)(xi);

(iii)(iv) "THC" means as defined by W.S.
11-51-101(a)(vii).

Section 3. W.S. 11-51-103(f)(ii) and 11-51-104(e) are
repealed.

Section 4. The department of revenue and the
department of agriculture shall adopt rules necessary to
HB0267

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0465
implement the regulation of consumable hemp products, as
provided in sections 1 and 2 of this act, not later than
January 1, 2026.

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Sections 1 through 3 of this act are effective
January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0267